test/tools/mt/apertium/apertiumtests_mt-gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/generator-mt-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/analyser-mt-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/generator-mt-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/analyser-mt-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# Tag tests:
  G3 - vuorru:
    vuorru+N+G3+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen: vuorru

  G7 - gálli:
    gálli+N+G7+Sem/DummyTag+Sg+Gen: gálli

  NomAg - nubbijođiheaddji:
    nubbijođiheaddji+N+NomAg+Sem/Hum+Sg+Gen: [nubbijođiheaddji, nuppijođiheaddji, nubbejođiheaddji, nubbinjođiheaddji]

# No variant tags should be visible:
  v1 - rekruterenoassi:
    rekruterenoassi+N+Sem/DummyTag+Sg+Gen: rekruterenoasi

  v2 - servodatfágalinjá:
    servodatfágalinjá+N+Sem/Edu+Sg+Gen: servvodatfágalinjjá

  v3 - lohkanlistu:
    lohkanlistu+N+Sem/Txt+Sg+Gen: lohkanlisttá

  v4 - servodatvásihus:
    servodatvásihus+N+Sem/Perc-emo+Sg+Gen: servvodatvásihusa

  v5 - sihkkelkursa:
    sihkkelkursa+N+Sem/Edu+Sg+Gen: syhkkelgurssa

  v6 - eanahálddašanláhka:
    eanahálddašanláhka+N+Sem/Txt+Sg+Gen: eatnanhálddahanlága

  v7 - eahkediskursa:
    eahkediskursa+N+Sem/Edu+Sg+Gen: eahketkurssa

  v8 - diibmolistu:
    diibmolistu+N+Sem/Txt+Sg+Gen: tiibmalistta

# Sem tags in all cases, used for disambiguation:
  Sem/Sur - Risten:
    Risten+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Risten

  Sem/Plc - Romsa:
    Romsa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Romssa

  Sem/Hum - ipmil:
    ipmil+N+Sem/Hum+Sg+Gen: ipmil

  Sem/Veh - biila:
    biila+N+Sem/Veh+Sg+Gen: biilla

  Sem/Txt - girji:
    girji+N+Sem/Txt+Sg+Gen: girjji

# Spell relax tests:
  eth - diehtit: # no spell relax in MT
    diehtit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ~dieðe

# Adverbial clitics should be recognised:
  Clitics - gielanaigo:
    giella+N+Sem/Lang+Sg+Gen+Foc/naj+Qst: gielanaigo

# No dialect tags:
  No dialect tags - earenoamáš:
    erenoamáš+A+Sg+Gen: earenoamáš

# No derivations except for passive and goahti:
  No dimin derivation:
    biila+N+Sem/Veh+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: biillaš

  Accept passive derivation:
    oaivvildit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oaivvilduvvo

  Accept both long and short passives:
    gullat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gullojuvvot
    gullat+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gullot

  Accept derivations with Der/goahti:
    gullat+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gullagoađát

# Test that compounds go through with the expected form and analysis:
  Compound1:
    biila+N+Sem/Veh+SgNomCmp+Cmp#guovlu+N+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: biilaguovlu
